North Carolina statutes. Chapter 7A. Judicial Department.
Article 37A. Access to Civil Justice Act.

§§ 7A-474.1 through 7A-474.5.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2017-57, s. 18B.10(c), effective June 28, 2017.

History.

G.S. 7A-474.1; 1989, c. 795, s. 25; 2001-424, s. 22.14(e); 2007-323, s. 30.8(g); repealed by 2017-57, s. 18B.10(c), effective June 28, 2017. G.S. 7A-474.2; 1989, c. 795, s. 25; 2001-424, s. 22.14(f); 2007-323, s. 30.8(h); 2007-547, s. 9; 2008-194, s. 3(a); repealed by 2017-57, s. 18B.10(c), effective June 28, 2017. G.S. 7A-474.3; 1989, c. 795, s. 25; 1997-506, s. 29; 2007-547, s. 10; 2008-107, s. 14.9; 2011-145, s. 19.1(h); 2012-83, s. 15; repealed by 2017-57, s. 18B.10(c), effective June 28, 2017. G.S. 7A-474.4; 1989, c. 795, s. 25; 2001-424, s. 22.14(g); 2007-323, s. 30.8(i); 2008-194, s. 3(b); repealed by 2017-57, s. 18B.10(c), effective June 28, 2017. G.S. 7A-474.5; 1989, c. 795, s. 25; 2001-424, s. 22.14(h); 2007-323, s. 30.8(j); repealed by 2017-57, s. 18B.10(c), effective June 28, 2017.

§§ 7A-474.6 through 7A-474.15.

Reserved for future codification purposes.